Louisiana, session 2026, HB1106.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Article 810(D)(4) and 881.2 are hereby enacted to read
as follows:
Art. 810. Waiver of right to counsel
* * *
D. The child shall not be permitted to waive assistance of counsel in the
following circumstances:
* * *
(4) During a custodial interrogation.
* * *
Art. 881.2. Admissibility of statement made by child during a custodial
interrogation
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a statement made
by a child during a custodial interrogation is not admissible in any judicial
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2050 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1106
proceeding unless the child had his counsel present during the interrogation. No
child may waive the right to counsel for the purposes of custodial interrogation.
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 230 is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Art. 230. Rights of person arrested
The person arrested has, from the moment of his arrest, a right to procure and
confer with counsel and to use a telephone or send a messenger for the purpose of
communicating with his friends or with counsel. Anyone fifteen years of age and
younger is subject to Children's Code Article 881.2.
Section 3. R.S. 15:451 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§451. Condition precedent to use of confession; free and voluntary rule
Before what purports to be a confession can be introduced in evidence, it
must shall be affirmatively shown that it was free and voluntary, and not made under
the influence of fear, duress, intimidation, menaces, threats, inducements or
promises. Anyone fifteen years of age and younger is subject to Children's Code
Article 881.2.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the day following such approval.